Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.070

When registration effective—Requirements determined by rule.

If the application meets the requirements for registration, as the director may by rule or otherwise determine, and no denial order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under RCW 21.20.110, the director shall make the registration effective.

[ 1998 c 15 s 6; 1981 c 272 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 77 s 2; 1959 c 282 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 77: See note following RCW 21.20.040.